Wyoming, session 2025, HB0089.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 18-5-503(a)(vi), 18-5-504 by creating
a new subsection (f), 35-11-402(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xvi), 35-12-109(a) by creating a new paragraph
HB0089

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0431
(xxiii) and 35-12-113 by creating a new subsection (k) are
amended to read:

18-5-503. Application.

(a) To obtain the permit required by W.S. 18-5-502,
the owner or developer of a facility shall submit an
application to the board of county commissioners. The
application shall:

(vi) Provide a waste management plan that
includes an inventory of estimated solid wastes and a
proposed disposal program for the construction, operation
and eventual decommissioning of the proposed facility. For
wind energy facilities under this article, the application
shall provide a disposal plan for the onsite disposal of
decommissioned wind turbine blades and towers in accordance
with W.S. 35-11-402(a)(xvi) and 35-12-113(k);

18-5-504. Minimum standards; incorporation into other
processes.

HB0089

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0431
(f) Wind energy facilities subject to this article
shall dispose of all decommissioned wind turbine blades and
towers from the facility in accordance with W.S.
35-11-402(a)(xvi) and 35-12-113(k).

35-11-402. Establishment of standards.

(a) The council shall, upon recommendation by the
advisory board through the administrator and the director,
establish rules and regulations pursuant to the following
reclamation standards for the affected areas, including but
not limited to:

(xvi) Rules and regulations for the disposal of
decommissioned wind turbine blades and towers on the site
specified in the permit for the wind energy facility under
W.S. 18-5-504 and 35-12-113. Rules promulgated under this
paragraph shall:

(A) Require the disposal of decommissioned
wind turbine blades and towers on the site where the wind
turbines operated;

HB0089

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0431
(B) Provide minimum depth requirements and
account for any aquifers as defined in W.S.
35-11-103(h)(i);

(C) Require the removal of all mechanical,
electrical and other materials from the decommissioned wind
turbine blades and towers allowing only the base material
of the blades and towers to be buried;

(D) Provide for the incorporation or
amendment of any rules pertaining to solid and hazardous
waste necessary to allow for the disposal of decommissioned
wind turbine blades and towers;

(E) Prohibit the disposal of wind turbine
blades and towers in solid waste disposal facilities in
accordance with W.S. 35-12-113(k);

(F) Provide exceptions to the requirement
for onsite disposal in accordance with W.S. 35-12-113(k);

(G) Not be any more stringent than rules
governing the disposal of wind turbine blades and towers in
HB0089

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0431
municipal solid waste facilities or surface coal mining
sites.

35-12-109. Application for permit; form; fee;
financial accounting.

(a) An application for a permit shall be filed with
the division, in a form as prescribed by council rules and
regulations, and shall contain the following information:

(xxiii) For proposed facilities meeting the
requirements of W.S. 35-12-102(a)(vii)(E) or (F), a
disposal plan for the onsite disposal of decommissioned
wind turbine blades and towers in accordance with W.S.
35-11-402(a)(xvi) and 35-12-113(k).

35-12-113. Decision of council; findings necessary
for permit conditions imposed; service of decision on
parties; waste management surcharge.

(k) For facilities meeting the definition of W.S.
35-12-102(a)(vii)(E) or (F), the council shall, in its
decision granting a permit, require the operator of the
HB0089

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0431
facility to dispose of wind turbine blades and towers on
the site where the facility is authorized to be located
under the permit. No decommissioned wind turbine blades and
towers for facilities permitted under this act or under
W.S. 18-5-504 shall be disposed of in solid waste disposal
facilities. Disposal of wind turbine blades and towers
shall be in accordance with W.S. 35-11-402(a)(xvi) and all
rules promulgated under that paragraph. This subsection
shall not apply to:

(i) The onsite recycling of wind turbine blades
and towers;

(ii) The removal or disposal of mechanical,
electrical and other materials from decommissioned wind
turbine blades and towers;

(iii) The disposal of decommissioned wind
turbine blades and towers at surface coal mining sites in
accordance with W.S. 35-11-402(a)(xiii).

Section 2.

HB0089

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0431
(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, this
act shall apply to all wind energy facilities for which a
permit is issued under W.S. 35-12-113 or 18-5-504 on and
after July 1, 2025.

(b) Nothing in this act shall be construed to amend,
alter or impair any contract, lease or other agreement
entered into before July 1, 2025.

Section 3.

(a) The environmental quality council, upon
recommendation by the department of environmental quality,
shall promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

(b) The industrial siting council shall promulgate
all rules necessary to implement this act.

HB0089

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0431
Section 4.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0089